Massachusetts, session 194th, H930.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding section 7 of chapter 132A of the General Laws or any other law or rule
to the contrary, the hunting of deer by bow and arrow in the Wompatuck State Park shall be
permitted. The commissioner of the department of conservation and recreation may promulgate
rules and regulations to provide for such hunting.
of 1